Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202585-2623
Department of Revenue; powers and duties.

The Department of Revenue shall administer and enforce the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act and may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 113;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 85-2606;

Laws 2025, LB608, § 16.